Spell/share/myspell/dicts/fo_FO.aff
SET ISO8859-1
TRY anrisltumegkðdvofbpøáyjhóíúæýSAMTEKLBHJNGcRFCVDIPOzUWZwYÁxÍÓØéÚqåèÅäQëöXÆÐç

COMPOUNDFLAG m
COMPOUNDMIN 4

# -----------------------------------------------------------------------
# affix info below has been automatically created from ispell faroese aff
# file with help from ispellaff2myspell script. Please read comments below
# for copyright notice. Note that comments below refer to the ispell aff
# file, not to the myspell one, so some of them might not apply here.
#                                            agmartin _AT_ debian dot org
# -----------------------------------------------------------------------


#    føroyskt.aff, version 0.0.2 (2001-05-27)
#
#    Copyright © Jacob Sparre Andersen, 2001.
#
#    This affix file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This affix file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
#    along with this affix file;  if not, write to the Free Software
#    Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave., Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.
#
#    Notice that this affix file will only work (correctly) with
#    ispell compiled with MASKBITS >= 64.
#
#    Since ispell doesn't correctly handle letters being the same
#    character in upper and lower case, - (hyphen) is defined as being
#    the uppercase equivalent of ' (apostroph).
#
#    From this point on the comments will probably only be of interest
#    to Faroese-speaking persons, and are therefore in Faroese.
#
#    Viðmerkingar og uppskot til broytingar kunnu sendast til <jacob@flug.fo>
#
#    Bøkur um føroysk mállæra:
#
#       W. B. Lockwood, "An Introduction to Modern Faroese", Føroya
#       Skúlabókagrunnur, 1977.
#
#       Paulivar Andreasen og Árni Dahl, "Mállæra", Føroya Skúlabókagrunnur,
#       1997.
# Fløgg:	ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ	abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
# Í brúk:	ssssssssssssssssss        	                     ppppp
# (s = suffiks, p = prefiks)
# Samansett orð:
#
# Føroyingar átti at duga at seta orð saman, men fyribils loyva via øll
# orð at verða sett saman:
# Bókstavir:
#############
# Suffikser #
#############
#############################################
# Navnorð, kallkyn, sterkt bend:
# Bendingarformurin fyri "úlvur" í eintali:
#
#  úlv·ur   úlv·urin
#  úlv      úlv·in
#  úlv·i    úlv·inum
#  úlv·s    úlv·sins
#
# Sum úlvur bendast til dømis:
#   bátur, bilur, dómur, dreymur, fiskur, fuglur, heimur, høvundur, knívur,
#   køkur, peningur, steinur
#
# Einans í eintali bendast fylgjandi sum úlvur:
#   dámur, dentur, deymur, eyrur, grátur, hýrur, lyngur, toyur
#
# Bendingarformurin fyri "úlvur" í fleirtali:
#
#  úlv·ar   úlv·arnir
#  úlv·ar   úlv·arnar
#  úlv·um   úlv·unum
#  úlv·a    úlv·anna
SFX A Y 7
SFX A   ur    0           ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    i           ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    s           ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    urin        ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    in          ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    inum        ur                       # 
SFX A   ur    sins        ur                       # 

# Bendingarformurin fyri "vinur" í eintali:
#
#  vin·ur   vin·urin
#  vin      vin·in
#  vin·i    vin·inum
#  vin·ar   vin·arins
#
# Sum vinur bendast til dømis:
#   burður, býur, fyrimunur, fundur, liður, litur, rættur, seyður, siður,
#   skurður, stættur, svágur, lutur, vegur
# og øll kallkynsorð ið enda á ·aður í hvørfalli eintali:
#   búnaður, fagnaður, fenaður, hernaður, javnaður, kostnaður, lesnaður,
#   mánaður, marknaður, skilnaður, trúnaður, vevnaður
#
# Einans í eintali bendast fylgjandi sum vinur:
#   friður
#
SFX B Y 7
SFX B   ur    ar          ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    um          ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    a           ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    arnir       ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    arnar       ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    unum        ur                       # 
SFX B   ur    anna        ur                       # 

# Bendingarformurin fyri "vinur" í fleirtali:
#
#  vin·ir   vin·irnir
#  vin·ir   vin·irnar
#  vin·um   vin·unum
#  vin·a    vin·anna
SFX C Y 7
SFX C   ur    0           ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    i           ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    ar          ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    urin        ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    in          ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    inum        ur                       # 
SFX C   ur    arins       ur                       # 

# Nøkur orð bendast sum úlvur í eintali, men sum vinur í fleirtali:
#   gestur, blettur, hvalur, leikur, løkur, minuttur, missur, salur, seiður,
#   skelkur, smiður, stavur, svanur.
# Bendingarformurin fyri "snigil" í eintali og fleirtali:
#
#  snig·il     snig·ilin
#  snig·il     snig·ilin
#  snig·li     snig·linum
#  snig·ils    snig·ilsins
#
#  snig·lar    snig·larnir
#  snig·lar    snig·larnar
#  snig·lum    snig·lunum
#  snig·la     snig·lanna
#
# Sum snigil bendast til dømis:
#   biðil, diskil, eingil, ketil, krypil, kyndil, miðil, ongul, seðil, smyril,
#   tunnil, vindil
#
SFX D Y 7
SFX D   ur    ir          ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    um          ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    a           ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    irnir       ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    irnar       ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    unum        ur                       # 
SFX D   ur    anna        ur                       # 

# Bendingarformurin fyri "akur" í eintali:
#
#  ak·ur     ak·urin
#  ak·ur     ak·urin
#  ak·ri     ak·rinum
#  ak·urs    ak·ursins
#
# Sum akur bendast til dømis:
#   fingur, lúður, meldur, metur, róður, snúður, svágur, vetur
#   fepur, fyrilestur, hungur, látur, litur, sigur
#
# Einans í eintali bendast fylgjandi sum akur:
#   gjóstur, hungur, látur, stimbur
#
SFX E Y 21
SFX E   il    li          il                       # 
SFX E   ul    li          ul                       # 
SFX E   0     s           [iu]l                    # 
SFX E   0     in          [iu]l                    # 
SFX E   il    linum       il                       # 
SFX E   ul    linum       ul                       # 
SFX E   0     sins        [iu]l                    # 
SFX E   il    lar         il                       # 
SFX E   ul    lar         ul                       # 
SFX E   il    lum         il                       # 
SFX E   ul    lum         ul                       # 
SFX E   il    la          il                       # 
SFX E   ul    la          ul                       # 
SFX E   il    larnir      il                       # 
SFX E   ul    larnir      ul                       # 
SFX E   il    larnar      il                       # 
SFX E   ul    larnar      ul                       # 
SFX E   il    lunum       il                       # 
SFX E   ul    lunum       ul                       # 
SFX E   il    lanna       il                       # 
SFX E   ul    lanna       ul                       # 

# Bendingarformurin fyri "akur" í fleirtali:
#
#  ak·rar    ak·rarnir
#  ak·rar    ak·rarnar
#  øk·rum    øk·runum
#  ak·ra     ak·ranna
#
# Sum akur bendast til dømis:
#   fingur, lúður, meldur, metur, róður, snúður, svágur, vetur
#
SFX F Y 5
SFX F   ur    ri          ur                       # 
SFX F   0     s           ur                       # 
SFX F   0     in          ur                       # 
SFX F   ur    rinum       ur                       # 
SFX F   0     sins        ur                       # 
