Spell/share/myspell/dicts/fo_FO.dic
Miðgarður/A
akur/FG
aldingarður/A
altjóðadómstólur/AB
amboðspeningur/AB
andstøðulimur/CD
andstøðutinglimur/D
arbeiðsmarknaður/CD
arbeiðspeningur/AB
armur/A
aðalfundur/CD
aðalstjórafundur/CD
barmur/A
barnaansingarstovnur/AB
barnagarður/A
barnapeningur/A
barnastyrkur/AD
barnaverdarlimur/CD
barnsburðarpeningur/A
bilur/AB
biskupsgarður/A
bispagarður/A
biðil/E
blaðstjórnalimur/CD
blaðstjórnarlimur/CD
blettur/AD
blákrosslimur/CD
borgarafundur/D
brimgarður/A
brúðgómur/A
burðarlimur/CD
burður/CD
bygdaráðsfundur/D
bygdaráðslimur/CD
byggifrøðingur/AB
bátur/AB
bóndagarður/A
bøgarður/A
búkrókur/AB
búnaður/CD
býráðsfundur/D
býráðslimur/CD
býur/CD
dagpeningur/AB
deymur/A
diskil/E
djóragarður/A
dreymur/AB
dámur/A
dómpróstur/AB
dómstólur/AB
dómur/AB
dópur/A
dýragarður/A
eftirlitsstovnur/AB
eginpeningur/AB
eingil/E
einstaklingur/AB
eldkrókur/AB
eldur/A
eygnakrókur/AB
eykabýráðsfundur/CD
eykafundur/D
eykalimur/CD
eykavinningur/AB
eyrur/A
eysturoyingur/AB
fagnaður/CD
familjulimur/CD
feilur/AD
felagslimur/CD
fenaður/CD
ferðafrádráttur/D
festigarður/A
fingur/FG
fiskaprísur/CD
fiskifrøðingur/AB
fiskikrókur/AB
fiskur/B
flogbóltur/AB
flokkur/B
floksstjórnarlimur/CD
foreldrafundur/D
foreldraumboðslimur/CD
forgarður/A
friður/C
frádráttur/D
frøðingur/AB
fuglafjarðaprestur/AB
fuglur/AB
fundur/CD
fyrimunur/CD
fíggjarmarknaður/CD
fíggjarnevndarlimur/CD
fílur/AB
fólkafundur/CD
fólkatingslimur/CD
føroyingur/AB
garður/A
gerningur/B
gerðisgarður/A
gestur/AD
gjóstur/F
grasagarður/A
grindakrókur/AB
grunnur/B
grátur/A
gudur/AB
heidningur/B
heimamarknaður/CD
heimur/AB
heiðurslimur/CD
hernaður/CD
hestur/AB
heystfundur/D
hjallur/A
hoyvíkingur/AB
hundur/B
hungur/F
hvalur/AD
hvanngarður/A
høvundur/AB
høvuðsprestur/AB
ikki-limur/C
illskapur/C
jarðfrøðingur/AB
javnaður/CD
kerúbur/B
kirkjugarður/A
kirkjuráðslimur/CD
kjarnur/B
klædnakrókur/AB
knappur/A
knívur/AB
kolvetnisfundur/D
kommunustýrisfundur/D
kommunustýrislimur/CD
kongsgarður/A
kongur/B
kostnaður/CD
kreppufundur/D
krypil/E
krókur/ABx
kunningarfundur/D
kyndil/E
kálgarður/A
kærudómstólur/AB
køkur/AB
landsfundur/D
landsgrunnur/B
landsnevndarlimur/CD
landsstýrisfundur/D
landsstýrislimur/CD
landsstýrisnevndarlimur/CD
landstingslimur/CD
landstýrislimur/CD
landsverkfrøðingur/AB
leiklutur/CD
leikur/ABD
lesnaður/CD
leypur/AB
limur/CD
litur/CD
liður/ACD
losjulimur/CD
lundakrókur/AB
lutur/CD
látur/F
læraralutur/CD
læripeningur/AB
lærlingur/B
lærusveinur/B
lógartekstur/AD
lóggávuspurningur/AB
løgfrøðingur/AB
løgtingslimur/CD
løkur/AD
lúður/FG
mannarættindadómstólur/AB
manngarður/A
marknaður/CD
meirilutalimur/CD
meldur/FG
mentanararvur/A
mentanarstovnur/AB
metur/FG
millumgarður/A
minuttur/AD
miðil/E
munnur/AB
mánaður/CD
nettoprísur/CD
nevndarfundur/D
nevndarlimur/CD
næmingalutur/CD
næmingur/AB
ongul/E
parlamentslimur/CD
partapeningur/AB
partur/B
peningur/A
pensjónistur/AB
prestagarður/A
prestur/AB
profetur/AB
prísur/CD
próstur/AB
pussfiskur/AB
rimagarður/A
ringur/B
roknskapur/D
ráðslimur/CD
rættur/CD
ríkislutur/CD
róður/FG
samfelagslimur/CD
samgongulimur/CD
samgongutinglimur/CD
samráðingarfundur/D
samráðingarleiklutur/CD
samráðingarnevndarlimur/CD
samveldisdómstólur/AB
savnaður/C
seyður/CD
seðil/E
siður/CD
skapningur/A
skelkur/ACD
skergarður/A
skilnaður/CD
skrápskrókur/AB
skurður/CD
skúlagarður/A
skúlastýrislimur/CD
smiður/AD
smyril/E
snigil/E
snúður/FG
soðspónur/AB
soðsteinur/AB
stavur/ACD
staður/C
steinur/AB
stimbur/F
stjórnarlimur/CD
stovnur/AB
stuðulslimur/CD
stættur/CD
stólur/AB
stýrislimur/CD
svanur/AD
sveinur/AB
svágur/CDFG
sáttmálanevndarlimur/CD
sóknarkrókur/AB
sóknarprestur/AB
tiltakslimur/CD
tindur/AB
tingfundur/D
tinglimur/CD
tjóðartingslimur/CD
tjóðpallur/B
trúnaður/CD
tunnil/E
tvørgarður/A
umboðslimur/CD
umboðsnevndarlimur/CD
ungur/BN
valfundur/D
valnevndarlimur/CD
valstýrislimur/CD
varalimur/CD
vegur/ACD
verndargarður/A
vetur/FG
vevnaður/CD
veðrur/B
vindur/B
vinur/CD
virðisbrævamarknaður/CD
vitnisburður/C
víggarður/A
vøruprísur/CD
vøruvognur/AB
Ólavur/A
áarvegur/CD
ársfundur/D
ávísur/B
ælingur/AB
íslendingur/AB
ørvaroddur/B
úlvur/AB
útróðrarbátur/AB
